Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1

County Zoning

13-7-101. Grant of zoning power.

The county legislative body of any county is empowered, in accordance with the conditions and the procedure specified in this part, to regulate, in the portions of such county which lie outside of municipal corporations, the location, height and size of buildings and other structures, the percentage of lot which may be occupied, the sizes of yards, courts, and other open spaces, the density and distribution of population, the uses of buildings and structures for trade, industry, residence, recreation or other purposes, and the uses of land for trade, industry, residence, recreation, agriculture, forestry, soil conservation, water supply conservation or other purposes, and identify areas where there are inadequate or nonexistent publicly or privately owned and maintained services and facilities when the planning commission has determined the services are necessary in order for development to occur. Special districts or zones may be established in those areas deemed subject to seasonal or periodic flooding, and such regulations may be applied therein as will minimize danger to life and property, and as will secure to the citizens of Tennessee the eligibility for flood insurance under Public Law 1016, 84th Congress, or subsequent related laws or regulations promulgated under such provisions. Protection and encouragement of access to sunlight for solar energy systems may be considered in promulgating zoning regulations pursuant to this section. Quarrying shall be uniformly defined, for purposes of all county zoning regulations, as the extraction, removal and mechanized processing of stone, gravel, phosphate rock, metallic ore, limestone, marble, chert, sand, dimension stone and any other solid mineral or substance of commercial value, except coal and deep metal mining, including, but not limited to zinc, found in natural deposits in the earth, for barter or sale. The definition of quarrying shall not include the reuse of these minerals on the same site from which they are extracted. This definition shall have no effect on the exception contained in § 54-1-128. The removal of borrow material from a site and the placement of the same material on a project site without any mechanized processing shall not be considered quarrying.

The transfer of development rights may be provided for in the promulgation of zoning regulations pursuant to this section. The creation, amendment or repeal of regulations, districts or maps providing for the transfer of development rights shall be in compliance with §§ 13-7-104 and 13-7-105. The transfer of development rights shall not be subject to taxation pursuant to title 67, chapter 4 or 6; provided, that any instruments recorded in the county register's office as the result of the transfer of development rights shall be subject to the fees set out in § 8-21-1001. Any regulations authorizing the transfer of development rights shall provide that conveyances of development rights shall be in writing and shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds and that whenever transferred development rights are allocated to any property, such allocation shall not become effective until the transferred development rights are noted in an instrument or on a plat and recorded in the office of the register of deeds.

A town, city, county, a county with a metropolitan form of government, the state of Tennessee, or a not-for-profit conservation or preservation organization may be the receiving entity of a development right without allocating or designating the transferred development right to any receiving property under its ownership or control. A town, city, county, a county with a metropolitan form of government, the state of Tennessee, or a not-for-profit conservation or preservation organization shall be allowed to receive all or part of the donating property's development rights notwithstanding any local zoning regulations pertaining to any required ratio or amount of land area a receiving property must contain in relation to the land area of the donating property or of the total amount of density that a receiving property may obtain from the donating property.

This subdivision (a)(2) shall be strictly construed with the specific intent to allow a local government to establish its own plan whereby the owners of property in a restrictive area (historical, agricultural, rural area as designated in the county's growth plan, or environmental) can sell the development rights to a developer or another individual and only with the consent of the property owner and through negotiations of development rights in the free marketplace. A property owner may donate, through gift or through testamentary disposition, all or part of the development rights of the owner's property to a town, city, county, a county with a metropolitan form of government, the state of Tennessee, or a not-for-profit conservation or preservation organization. Any town, city, county, county with a metropolitan government, the state, or any not-for-profit conservation or preservation organization may purchase development rights from a property owner with the consent of the property owner and the purchase shall be through negotiations of the development rights in the free marketplace. Any town, city, county, county with a metropolitan government, the state, or any not-for-profit conservation or preservation organization may preserve the purchased or donated development rights unused for a definite or indefinite period of time and may at any time sell the development rights so held to a property owner in a designated receiving area with the purchase being one negotiated in the free marketplace. In order to accept a donation of development rights or for the purchase or sale of developments rights by a town, city, county, or county with a metropolitan government, the donation, purchase or sale must be approved by that government's legislative body.

It is the legislative intent that the provisions of this section relative to the transfer of development rights are permissive and not mandatory. Such rights shall only be transferred by contract and not by operation of law.

The chief legislative body of any county having a population of not less than two hundred eighty-seven thousand seven hundred (287,700) nor greater than two hundred eighty-seven thousand eight hundred (287,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, is further authorized and empowered to rezone properties conditionally or based upon contract, where the agreed conditions are designed to ameliorate injuries created by the rezoning to surrounding property interests or to county interests.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.1; Acts 1957, ch. 306, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; Acts 1979, ch. 259, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-401; Acts 1985, ch. 44, § 1; 1987, ch. 361, §§ 1, 4; 2001, ch. 265, §§ 1-4; 2008, ch. 1150, § 11; 2011, ch. 217, § 1; 2012, ch. 755, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Public Law 1016, 84th Congress, was compiled in 42 U.S.C. §§ 2401-2421; however, these provisions were repealed by Pub. L. 90-488, § 1377, part of the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968, which is presently compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 4001 et seq.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Airport zoning ordinance appeals, hearing by board, §§ 42-6-108, 42-6-109.

Borrow excavations, exemption of certain road work construction from local and regional zoning and planning regulations, § 54-1-128.

County adoption of prepared building, plumbing and gas codes, § 5-20-103.

Establishment of foreign-trade zones, title 7, ch. 85.

Local regulation of junkyards, § 54-20-122.

Utility location, title 13, ch. 24, part 3.

Zoning classifications, exclusion of manufactured residential dwellings prohibited, title 13, ch. 24, part 2.

Zoning classifications, residences of persons with disabilities, title 13, ch. 24, part 1.

Zoning regulations in metropolitan governments, § 7-3-304.

Law Reviews.

Growth and Its Implications: An Evaluation of Tennessee's Growth Management Plan, 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 983 (2000).

Into the Fracking Fray: A Balanced Approach to Regulating Hydraulic Fracturing in Tennessee, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 667 (2014).

Real Property — Zoning Ordinances — Validity, 39 Tenn. L. Rev. 542.

Sunny and Share: Balancing Airspace Entitlement Rights Between Solar Energy Adopters and Their Neighbors, 72 Vand. L. Rev. 1075 (April 2019).

Attorney General Opinions. Review of zoning plans and amendments by regional planning commission of each affected region, OAG 99-150, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 158 (8/16/99).

There is no constitutional requirement that a zoning ordinance be adopted by a two-thirds vote of the local legislative body or in a general election, OAG 04-007, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (1/16/04).

Meaning of “use permitted on review” under Tennessee zoning laws, OAG 06-142, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 164 (9/19/06).

13-7-102. Regional zoning plans — Execution by county legislative body.

From and after the time when the regional planning commission of any planning region defined and created by the [former] state planning office makes and certifies to the legislative body of any county located in whole or part in such region a zoning plan, including both the text of a zoning ordinance and the zoning maps, representing the recommendations of such planning commission for the regulation by districts or zones of the location, height and size of buildings and other structures, the percentage of lots that may be occupied, the sizes of yards, courts and other open spaces, the density and distribution of population, the location and uses of buildings and structures for trade, industry, residence, recreation or other purposes and the use of land for trade, industry, residence, recreation, agriculture, forestry, soil conservation, water supply conservation or other purposes, and identify areas where there are inadequate or nonexistent publicly or privately owned and maintained services and facilities when the planning commission has determined the services are necessary in order for development to occur, then the county legislative body may, by ordinance, exercise the powers granted in § 13-7-101 and, for the purpose of such exercise, may divide the territory of the county which lies within the region but outside of municipal corporations into districts of such number, shape or area as it may determine and within such districts may regulate the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration and uses of buildings and structures and the uses of land. All such regulations shall be uniform for each class or kind of buildings throughout any such district, but the regulations in one (1) district may differ from those in other districts. The regional planning commission may make and certify a single plan for all the territory of the county which lies within the region but outside of municipal corporations, or may make and certify separate and successive plans for parts of such territory which it deems to be suitable for urban or nonurban development or which for other reasons it deems to be an appropriate territorial unit for a zone plan; and correspondingly, any ordinance enacted by the county legislative body may cover and include the whole territory of the county which lies within the region but outside of municipal corporations covered and included in any such single plan or in any such separate and successive plans. No ordinance covering more or less than the entire area covered by any such certified plan shall be enacted or put into effect until or unless it is first submitted to the regional planning commission and is approved by the commission or, if disapproved, shall receive the favorable vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the entire membership of the county legislative body.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-402; Acts 2008, ch. 1150, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. The state planning office, referred to in this section, was abolished by Acts 1995, ch. 501, effective June 12, 1995.

Cross-References. Regional planning commission, § 13-3-104.

Attorney General Opinions. An ordinance or regulation imposing a design standard is valid unless it violates any state statute or positive constitutional guaranty or unless it is “clearly arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable, having no substantial relation to the public health, safety, or welfare.” Accordingly, whether any given ordinance or regulation requiring the observation of appearance-based residential building design standards for the construction of single family dwellings is valid is a fact-intensive inquiry, the answer to which will depend on the particular facts and circumstances related to the particular community. A given design standard may be reasonable in one community, but not in another. OAG 17-44, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS-44 (10/3/2017).

13-7-103. Purposes of zoning regulations.

Such regulations shall be designed and enacted for the purpose of promoting the health, safety, morals, convenience, order, prosperity and welfare of the present and future inhabitants of the state and of its counties, including, among other things, lessening congestion on the roads or reducing the wastes of excessive amount of roads; securing safety from fire and other dangers; promoting adequate light and air, including protecting and encouraging access to sunlight for solar energy systems; preventing, on the one hand, excessive concentrations of population and, on the other hand, excessive and wasteful scattering of population or settlement; promoting such distribution of population and such classification of land uses and distribution of land development and utilization as will tend to facilitate and conserve adequate provisions for transportation, water flowage, water supply, drainage, sanitation, educational opportunity, recreation, soil fertility, food supply and the protection of both urban and nonurban development, and identify areas where there are inadequate or nonexistent publicly or privately owned and maintained services and facilities when the planning commission has determined the services are necessary in order for development to occur.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.3; Acts 1979, ch. 259, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-403; Acts 2008, ch. 1150, § 13.

Law Reviews.

Sunny and Share: Balancing Airspace Entitlement Rights Between Solar Energy Adopters and Their Neighbors, 72 Vand. L. Rev. 1075 (April 2019).

Attorney General Opinions. An ordinance or regulation imposing a design standard is valid unless it violates any state statute or positive constitutional guaranty or unless it is “clearly arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable, having no substantial relation to the public health, safety, or welfare.” Accordingly, whether any given ordinance or regulation requiring the observation of appearance-based residential building design standards for the construction of single family dwellings is valid is a fact-intensive inquiry, the answer to which will depend on the particular facts and circumstances related to the particular community. A given design standard may be reasonable in one community, but not in another. OAG 17-44, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS-44 (10/3/2017).

13-7-104. Method of procedure after certification of plan from commission.

After the certification of a zone plan from the regional planning commission and before the enactment of any such zoning ordinance, the county legislative body shall hold a public hearing thereon, the time and place of which at least thirty (30) days' notice shall be given by one (1) publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. Such notice shall state the place at which the text and maps as certified by the planning commission may be examined. No change in or departure from the text or maps as certified by the regional planning commission shall be made, unless such change or departure be first submitted to the certifying regional planning commission for its approval, disapproval or suggestions, and, if disapproved, shall receive the favorable vote of a majority of the entire membership of the county legislative body. Such planning commission shall have thirty (30) days from and after such submission within which to send its report to the county legislative body. The entire text of a zoning ordinance need not be published in a newspaper. It is sufficient notice if the caption and a complete summary are published at least once in the official newspaper of the county or in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. The summary shall include a statement that a complete copy of the zoning ordinance is available and where such copy may be obtained. The ordinance shall not be in force until the required publication is made. If the zoning ordinance rezones property, a description of the property that is rezoned shall be included in the summary.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-404; Acts 1985, ch. 162, § 1; 1993, ch. 262, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1992, private ch. 195, pertains to county zoning in Giles County, although it purported to amend general law. For this reason the governor returned the act without signature.

13-7-105. Amendments of zoning ordinance provisions — Procedure.

The county legislative body may, from time to time, amend the number, shape, boundary, area or any regulation of or within any district or districts or any other provision of any zoning ordinance; but any such amendment shall not be made or become effective unless the same be first submitted for approval, disapproval or suggestions to the regional planning commission of the region in which the territory covered by the ordinance is located, and, if such regional planning commission disapproves within thirty (30) days after such submission, such amendment shall require the favorable vote of a majority of the entire membership of the county legislative body.

Prior to adopting an amendment as authorized under subsection (a), the county legislative body shall hold a public hearing on the amendment, with at least fifteen (15) days' notice of the time and place to be given by at least one (1) publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. A complete summary of the amendment shall be published at least once in the official newspaper of the county or in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. The summary shall include a statement that a complete copy of the amendment is available and where the copy may be obtained. If the zoning ordinance rezones property, a description of the property that is rezoned shall be included in the summary.

Notwithstanding this part or any other law to the contrary, any county having a charter form of government, adopted pursuant to title 5, chapter 1, part 2, may amend its zoning ordinance by means of resolution; and all zoning amendments passed by resolution prior to July 1, 1996, shall be deemed to be valid and shall not be attacked on the grounds that the amendments were accomplished by means of resolution rather than by ordinance.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-405; Acts 1989, ch. 34, § 1; 1993, ch. 244, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 262, §§ 2, 3; 1996, ch. 715, § 1; 1997, ch. 69, § 1; 2016, ch. 577, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 69, § 1 provided that the amendment by that act is intended to give effect to the legislative intent of having the amendment by Acts 1996, ch. 715, have application at the beginning of the 1996-1997 fiscal year, and that, for that purpose, this section shall have retroactive application to July 1, 1996.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 26 Tenn. Juris., Zoning, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1955 Tennessee Survey (Clyde L. Ball), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 1061.

Attorney General Opinions. Review of zoning plans and amendments by regional planning commission of each affected region, OAG 99-150, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 158 (8/16/99).

13-7-106. Creation of county board of zoning appeals — Appointment of members — Terms — Vacancies — Training and continuing education.

The legislative body of any county which enacts zoning regulations under the authority of this part shall create a county board of zoning appeals of three (3), five (5), seven (7), or nine (9) members. In any county which has adopted a charter form of government as provided in the Constitution of Tennessee, article VII, § 1, and by § 5-1-201, and which has a population of less than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the legislative body of any such county which enacts zoning regulations under the authority of this part shall create a county board of zoning appeals of five (5), seven (7) or nine (9) members. The county legislative body shall be the appointing power of the members of such board of appeals and may fix their compensation and their terms, which terms shall be of such length and so arranged that the term of one (1) member will expire each year. In any county which has adopted a charter form of government as provided in the Constitution of Tennessee, article VII, § 1, and by § 5-1-201, and which has a population of less than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county legislative body shall arrange their terms in any fashion so long as no member's term exceeds five (5) years in length. The county legislative body may remove any member for cause upon written charges and after a public hearing. Vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms in the same manner as in the case of original appointments. The county legislative body may appoint associate members of the board, and, in the event that any regular member be temporarily unable to act owing to absence from the county, illness, interest in a case before the board, or other cause, such associate member's place may be taken during such temporary disability by an associate member designated for the purpose by the county legislative body. The county legislative bodies of two (2) or more counties may, by ordinances enacted by both or all of them, arrange and provide for a joint or common board of zoning appeals.

Each board of zoning appeals member shall, within one (1) year of initial appointment and each calendar year thereafter, attend a minimum of four (4) hours of training and continuing education in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subdivision (b)(5).

Each full-time or contract building commissioner or professional planner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the board of zoning appeals shall, each calendar year, attend a minimum of eight (8) hours of training and continuing education in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subdivision (b)(5). A professional planner who is a member of the American Institute of Certified Planners (AICP) shall be exempt from this requirement.

Each of the individuals listed in subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) shall certify by December 31 of each calendar year such individual's attendance by a written statement filed with the secretary of such individual's respective board of zoning appeals. Each statement shall identify the date of each program attended, its subject matter, location, sponsors, and the time spent in each program.

The legislative body of the county shall be responsible for paying the training and continuing education course registration and travel expenses for each board of zoning appeals member and full-time building commissioner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the board of zoning appeals.

The subjects for the training and continuing education required by subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) shall include, but not be limited to, the following: land use planning; zoning; flood plain management; transportation; community facilities; ethics; public utilities; wireless telecommunications facilities; parliamentary procedure; public hearing procedure; land use law; natural resources and agricultural land conservation; economic development; housing; public buildings; land subdivision; and powers and duties of the board of zoning appeals. Other topics reasonably related to the duties of the board of zoning appeals and the building commissioner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the board of zoning appeals may be approved by majority vote of the board of zoning appeals prior to December 31 of the year for which credit is sought.

Each local board of zoning appeals shall keep in its official public record originals of all statements and the written documentation of attendance required to comply with these provisions for three (3) years after the calendar year in which each statement and appurtenant written documentation is filed.

Each board of zoning appeals member and each building commissioner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the board of zoning appeals shall be responsible for obtaining written documentation signed by a representative of the sponsor of any training and continuing education course for which credit is claimed, acknowledging the fact that the individual attended the program for which credit is claimed.

If a board of zoning appeals member fails to complete the requisite number of hours of training and continuing education within the time allotted by this subsection (b) or fails to file the statement required by this subsection (b), then this shall constitute a cause for the removal of the board of zoning appeals member from the board of zoning appeals.

The legislative body of the county may, at any time, opt out of this subsection (b) by passage of a resolution. Further any such legislative body that has opted out may, at a later date, opt in by passage of a resolution.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.6; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-406; Acts 1991, ch. 521, § 1; 1993, ch. 184, § 1; 2002, ch. 862, § 5; 2009, ch. 47, § 10; 2016, ch. 693, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2002, ch. 862, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Planning Commission and Board of Zoning Appeals Training and Continuing Education Act of 2002.”

Law Reviews.

Judicial Review and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (Toxey H. Sewell), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 253.

Attorney General Opinions. Exclusive authority of county legislative body to appoint board members, OAG 94-143, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 169 (12/13/94).

13-7-107. Rules of procedure and jurisdiction of board of appeals.

The county legislative body may provide and specify, in its zoning or other ordinance, general rules to govern the organization, procedure and jurisdiction of the board of appeals, which rules shall not be inconsistent with this part, and the board may adopt supplemental rules of procedure, not inconsistent with such sections or such general rules.

The supplemental rules of procedure may address, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Maintenance of a record of the board's resolutions, transactions, motions and actions, which shall be a public record;

Election from its membership of a chair and other officers as the board deems necessary; and

The inclusion of statements of reasons for the board's actions as part of each motion or action, including such findings of fact and statements of material evidence as the board may deem pertinent.

The zoning ordinance may provide that the board of appeals may, in appropriate cases and subject to appropriate principles, standards, rules, conditions and safeguards set forth in the ordinance, make special exceptions to the terms of the zoning regulations in harmony with their general purpose and intent. The county legislative body may also authorize the board of appeals to interpret the zoning maps and pass upon disputed questions of lot lines or district boundary lines or similar questions as they arise in the administration of the zoning regulations.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.6; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-407; Acts 2011, ch. 279, § 1.

13-7-108. Persons taking appeals.

Appeals to the board of appeals may be taken by any person aggrieved, or by any officer, department or board of the county affected, by any grant or withholding of a building permit or by any other decision of a building commissioner or other administrative official, based in whole or in part upon any ordinance under this part.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-408.

Attorney General Opinions. Zoning appeals by county legislative body—private property owner’s application for special use exception. OAG 10-108, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 114 (10/28/10).

13-7-109. Powers of board of appeals.

The board of appeals has the power to:

Hear and decide appeals where it is alleged by the appellant that there is error in any order, requirement, decision or refusal made by the county building commissioner or any other administrative official in the carrying out or enforcement of any ordinance enacted pursuant to this part;

Hear and decide, in accordance with the provisions of any such ordinance, requests for special exceptions or for interpretation of the map or for decisions upon other special questions upon which such board is authorized by any such ordinance to pass; and

Where, by reason of exceptional narrowness, shallowness, or shape of a specific piece of property at the time of the enactment of the regulation or by reason of exceptional topographic conditions or other extraordinary and exceptional situation or condition of such piece of property, the strict application of any regulation enacted under such sections would result in peculiar and exceptional practical difficulties to or exceptional and undue hardship upon the owner of such property, authorize, upon an appeal relating to the property, a variance from such strict application so as to relieve such difficulties or hardship; provided, that such relief may be granted without substantial detriment to the public good and without substantially impairing the intent and purpose of the zone plan and zoning ordinances.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-409.

13-7-110. Building commissioner — Position established — Permits.

Any county legislative body may provide for the enforcement of its zoning regulations by means of the withholding of building permits and, for such purpose, may establish the position of county building commissioner and may fix the compensation attached to such position. The county building commissioner shall be appointed by the county mayor, subject to the confirmation of the county legislative body. From and after the establishment of such position and the filling of same, it is unlawful to erect, construct, reconstruct, alter or use any building or other structure within the territory covered by such zoning regulations without obtaining a building permit from such county building commissioner, and such building commissioner shall not issue any permit unless the plans for the proposed erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration or use fully conform to all zoning regulations then in effect.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-410; Acts 1999, ch. 308, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2003, ch. 330, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Attorney General Opinions. Exclusive authority of county legislative body to appoint commissioner, OAG 94-143, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 169 (12/13/94).

County government authority to regulate an electric utility, OAG 07-028, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 28 (3/12/07).

13-7-111. Violation of regulations — Penalties — Modes of enforcement and remedies.

It is unlawful to erect, construct, reconstruct, alter, maintain or use any building or structure or to use any land in violation of any regulation in any provision of any ordinance or any amendment thereof enacted or adopted by any county legislative body under the authority of this part. A violation of this part is a Class C misdemeanor. Each and every day during which such illegal erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, maintenance or use continues is deemed a separate offense. In case any building or structure is or is proposed to be erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, maintained or used or any land is or is proposed to be used in violation of this part or of any regulation or provision enacted or adopted by any county legislative body under the authority granted by this part, such county legislative body, the attorney general and reporter, the district attorney general for the judicial district in which such violation occurs or is threatened, the county building commissioner or any adjacent or neighboring property owner who would be specially damaged by such violation, in addition to other remedies provided by law, may institute injunction, mandamus, abatement or any other appropriate action, actions, proceeding or proceedings to prevent, enjoin or abate or remove such unlawful erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, maintenance or use.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.8; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-411; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

13-7-112. Regulations conflicting with other laws.

Wherever the regulations made under authority of this part require a greater width or size of yards, courts or other open spaces, or require a lower height of buildings or less number of stories, or require a greater percentage of lot to be unoccupied, or impose other higher standards than are required in any other statute, the regulations made under authority of this part shall govern. Whenever any other statute requires a greater width or size of yards, courts or other open spaces, or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied, or impose other higher standards than are required by the standards that are required by the regulations made under authority of this part, the provisions of such statute shall govern.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-412.

13-7-113. “Regional planning commission” defined.

For the purposes of this part, “regional planning commission” means any regional planning commission established by the [former] state planning office as authorized by law, and includes any municipal planning commission designated by the state planning office, as authorized by law, as the regional planning commission of a planning region composed of the territory of a single municipality, together with territory adjoining but outside of such municipality.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.10; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-413.

Compiler's Notes. The state planning office, referred to in this section, was abolished by Acts 1995, ch. 501, effective June 12, 1995.

Cross-References. “Regional planning commission” defined, § 13-3-401.

13-7-114. Construction — Building permits — Agricultural use of land — Land located in special flood hazard area.

This part shall not be construed as authorizing the requirement of building permits nor providing for any regulation of the erection, construction, or reconstruction of any building or other structure on lands now devoted to agricultural uses or which may hereafter be used for agricultural purposes, except on agricultural lands adjacent or in proximity to state federal-aid highways, public airports or public parks; provided, that such building or structure is incidental to the agricultural enterprise. Nor shall this chapter be construed as limiting or affecting in any way or controlling the agricultural uses of land.

For purposes of this section, buildings used as residences by farmers and farm workers are “incidental to the agricultural enterprise”.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) or any other law to the contrary, a county participating in the national flood insurance program shall regulate buildings and development on land located in a special flood hazard area identified on the flood insurance rate map adopted by the county for purposes of participating in the national flood insurance program, but only to the minimum extent necessary to comply with the national flood insurance program.

Subdivision (c)(1) shall apply only to the regulation of buildings and development on land located within the one hundred-year floodplain.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 11; 1941, ch. 86, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-414; Acts 2014, ch. 524, § 1; 2015, ch. 192, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. County zoning of residential structures on land used for agricultural purposes. OAG 13-80, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 81 (10/22/13).

County zoning of buildings used as residences by farmers and farm workers. OAG 14-79, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (9/4/14).

The definition of “agriculture” in T.C. A. §§ 1-3-105(a)(2)(A) and 43-1-113(b)(1) applies in determining the meaning of “agricultural” as used in T.C.A. § 5-1-118(b), T.C.A. § 5-1-122, and T.C.A. § 13-7-114. AG LEXIS 35 (7/26/2017).

Based on the applicable definitions of “agriculture” and “agricultural,” concentrated animal feeding operations (CAFOs) clearly involve “agricultural” activities and the “agricultural” use of land and structures. Thus, a county is not authorized to regulate CAFOs under its zoning powers or its general powers. T.C.A. § 44-18-104 merely sets forth which zoning requirements and regulations apply when determining whether a feedlot, dairy farm, or poultry production house is to be afforded absolute immunity from a nuisance claim, but it does not provide authority for a county to enact zoning requirements or regulations. T.C.A. § 13-7-114, which prevents counties from using their zoning power to regulate structures and land used for agricultural purposes, is not in conflict with T.C.A. § 44-18-104 because there is no independent source of zoning power bestowed upon any local entity under this right-to-farm law. T.C.A § 44-18-104(b) and (d) do not direct compliance with the section when no zoning requirements or regulations exist. When no zoning requirements or regulations exist, these provisions convey that a person’s compliance with the section is deemed to be established as a matter of law. OAG 18-30, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (7/6/2018).